Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.570

Weighing devices—Rated capacity to exceed weight of load.

A weighmaster shall not use a weighing device to determine the weight of a load when the weight of such load exceeds the manufacturer's maximum rated capacity for such weighing device. If upon inspection the director declares that the maximum rated capacity of any weighing device is less than the manufacturer's maximum rated capacity, the weighmaster shall not weigh a load that exceeds the director's declared maximum rated capacity for such weighing device.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 28.]